Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1705HV (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 773 Section 1. Section 421.60, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 a. A prevailing taxpayer in an administrative hearing or 4 a court proceeding related to the determination, collection, 5 or refund of a tax, penalty, or interest shall be awarded 6 reasonable costs by the department or a court that are incurred 7 subsequent to the issuance of the notice of assessment or 8 denial of claim for refund in the proceeding, based upon the 9 following: 10 (1) Reasonable court costs. 11 (2) Reasonable prevailing market rates based upon the 12 services provided including but not limited to: 13 (a) Expert witnesses. 14 (b) The cost of a study, engineering report, test, analysis, 15 or project that is found by the director of revenue or court to 16 be necessary for the preparation of the case of the taxpayer. 17 (c) Fees paid or incurred by the taxpayer for the services 18 of an independent attorney or accountant including fees paid or 19 incurred in obtaining costs under this subsection. 20 Sec. 2. Section 421.60, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 21 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 c. For purposes of this section , âprevailing taxpayerâ means 23 a taxpayer who establishes that the position of the state was 24 not substantially justified and who has substantially prevailed 25 with respect to the amount in controversy or has substantially 26 prevailed with respect to the most significant issue or set of 27 issues presented. The determination of whether a taxpayer is 28 a prevailing taxpayer is to be determined in accordance with 29 chapter 17A . If the taxpayer establishes that the taxpayer 30 has substantially prevailed with respect to the amount in 31 controversy or has substantially prevailed with respect to the 32 most significant issue or set of issues presented, the burden 33 of proof shifts to the department of revenue to prove that the 34 position taken by the department was substantially justified. 35 -1- LSB 1705HV (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 773 If the department meets the burden by proving the position of 1 the department was substantially justified, the taxpayer shall 2 not be considered a prevailing taxpayer. 3